California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 hospital under this paragraph, but that is barred by the limitation described in clause (v), shall be distributed by the department through additional phases of the descending pro rata distribution process to those hospitals within the same group, as set forth in clauses (ii) and (iii), as the particular hospital. For each additional phase, the mathematical steps referred to in subclauses (II) to (V), inclusive, of clause (iv) shall be repeated for those hospitals that have not reached the limitation set forth in clause (v). The phases shall continue until the funds allocated to the particular group under clause (iii) have been fully exhausted. No such distribution, however, shall be in an amount that would cause any hospital to exceed the limitation set forth in clause (v).

(C) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, prior to the allocation or distribution of any secondary supplemental payment adjustments, hospitals that, as of July 1,
 1995, were part of a county-operated health system of three or more eligible hospitals licensed to the county, shall be deemed to have reached the limitations on total payments described in subclause (II) of clause (v) of subparagraph (B). Data regarding payment adjustments earned by these hospitals with respect to the 1995–96 payment adjustment year, whether paid or payable, shall be included in the computations under subparagraph (A), but excluded from the computations under subparagraph (B).

(D) The department shall make payments of the secondary supplemental payment adjustments to hospitals on or before November 30, 1996.

(10) The final total amount of per diem payment adjustments paid by the department for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year, plus the final total amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments and secondary supplemental payment adjustments paid by the
 department for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year, shall be the maximum size of the payment adjustment program for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year.

(11) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available. In doing so, the department shall comply with any procedures instituted by the Health Care Financing Administration in connection with Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(z) (1) (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law (except for subparagraph (B)), all Medi-Cal days of acute inpatient hospital service paid by or on behalf of the department that give rise to payment adjustment amounts with
 respect to the period October 1, 1994, through June 30, 1995, shall be treated as involving 1.4 days for purposes of payment adjustments with respect to this period of time. As a result, each per diem payment adjustment amount otherwise payable to the hospital in connection with these days shall be increased by 40 percent. The Medi-Cal days in question shall be treated as involving 1.4 days toward the maximum limit set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (l). The Medi-Cal days in question shall be treated as involving 1.0 days for purposes of determining the hospital’s annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days for the next applicable payment adjustment year.

(B) For the 1994–95 payment adjustment year, no eligible hospital shall receive total payment adjustments, including per diem payment adjustment amounts and any supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amounts, in excess of the projected total payment adjustment amounts that were
 computed or recomputed, as applicable, for the hospital by the department with respect to the 1994–95 payment adjustment year. For each hospital, this maximum figure shall not exceed the sum of the following two components:

(i) The final figure computed by the department as the hospital’s total per diem composite amount (including any applicable adjustments under subdivision (p)), multiplied by 80 percent of the hospital’s annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days.

(ii) The amount calculated by the department as the hospital’s pro rata share (based on the figures for all hospitals computed under clause (i)) of the remainder determined by subtracting (I) the sum of the figures computed for all hospitals under clause (i) from (II) the final maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under applicable federal rules for the 1995 federal fiscal year.

(C) Any payment adjustment amount that otherwise would be payable to a hospital, but that is barred by subparagraph (B), shall be withheld or recouped by the department and distributed on a descending pro rata basis as part of the supplemental lump-sum distribution described in subdivision (w) to those hospitals that have not reached their maximum figures as described in subparagraph (B).

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except for subparagraph (B), all Medi-Cal days of acute inpatient hospital service paid by or on behalf of the department that give rise to payment adjustment amounts with respect to the period October 1, 1995, through June 30, 1996, shall be treated as involving 1.4 days for purposes of payment adjustments with respect to this period of time. As a result, each per diem payment adjustment amount otherwise payable to the
 hospital in connection with these days shall be increased by 40 percent. The Medi-Cal days in question shall be treated as involving 1.4 days toward the maximum limit set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (l). The Medi-Cal days in question shall be treated as involving 1.0 days for purposes of determining the hospital’s annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days for the next applicable payment adjustment year.

(B) For the 1995–96 payment adjustment year, no eligible hospital shall receive total payment adjustments, including per diem payment adjustment amounts, supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amounts, and secondary supplemental payment adjustments in excess of the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation as computed by the department pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan. No hospital shall receive secondary supplemental payment adjustments to the extent the payment adjustments would be inconsistent with paragraph (9) of
 subdivision (y).

(C) Any payment adjustment amount that otherwise would be payable to a hospital, but that is barred by subparagraph (B), shall be withheld or recouped by the department and thereafter distributed to other eligible hospitals, refunded to transferors, or otherwise processed in accordance with this section and Section 14163.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to the extent necessary or appropriate to implement and administer the amendments to this section enacted during the 1994 calendar year, the department may utilize an approach involving interim payments, with reconciliation to final payments within a reasonable time.

(aa) (1) For the 1996–97 payment adjustment year, each eligible hospital that remains in operation as of June 30, 1997, shall also be eligible to
 receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment, that shall be payable as a result of the facility being a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date. The availability of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this paragraph shall be determined by the department as follows:

(A) The projected total payment adjustment amount for each hospital, as determined by the department at the outset of the payment adjustment year, including any reductions arising from payment limitations under this section, shall be identified. For each hospital, this amount shall be identical to the amount that was used for the same hospital in the calculations made at the outset of the 1996–97 state fiscal year regarding transfer amounts under subdivision (h) of Section 14163 for that fiscal year.

(B) The total amount of all per diem payment adjustment amounts under this
 section, whether paid or payable, that are applicable to the period July 1, 1996, through June 30, 1997, shall be determined for each hospital. The applicability of the per diem payment adjustment amounts to this period of time shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) The amount determined under subparagraph (B) for each hospital shall be subtracted from the amount identified under subparagraph (A) for each hospital. If the remainder is a positive figure for the particular hospital, the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment for the hospital shall be the positive remainder amount, which shall be payable because the facility is a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of June 30, 1997.

(D) The department shall make interim and final payments of the
 supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this paragraph on or before September 30, 1997.

(2) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available. In doing so, the department shall comply with any procedures instituted by the Health Care Financing Administration in connection with Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ab) (1) For the 1997–98 payment adjustment year, eligible hospitals that meet the requirements of this subdivision and that remain in operation as of September 30, 1997, shall be eligible to receive a special supplemental payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the facility being a
 disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date. For purposes of federal medicaid rules, including Section 447.297(d) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the special supplemental payment adjustments shall be applicable to the federal fiscal year that ends on September 30, 1997.

(2) The availability of special supplemental payment adjustments under this subdivision shall be determined as follows:

(A) The final maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules shall be identified for the 1997 federal fiscal year.

(B) The total amount of all per diem payment adjustment amounts and supplemental payment adjustments under this section (exclusive of any payments under this subdivision) applicable to the 1997 federal
 fiscal year, whether paid or payable, shall be determined. The applicability of per diem payment adjustment amounts and supplemental payment adjustments of all types to the 1997 federal fiscal year shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) The figure determined under subparagraph (B) shall be subtracted from the figure identified under subparagraph (A). If the remainder is a positive figure, special supplemental payment adjustments shall be made under this subdivision in accordance with paragraph (3). The positive remainder shall be the maximum amount of special supplemental payment adjustments under this subdivision.

(3) (A) For purposes of these special supplemental payment adjustments, only hospitals that can be categorized into either of
 the two groups specified in clauses (i) and (ii) shall be eligible to receive the supplemental payment adjustments, and no hospital may qualify for more than one of the two groups. The following groups of hospitals shall be recognized:

(i) “Public hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1997, met the definition of a public hospital.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1997, met the definition of a nonpublic hospital.

(B) The amount determined to be the maximum amount of special supplemental payment adjustments under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) shall first be allocated between the two groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraph (A) as follows:

(i) “Public
 hospitals”: 74.885 percent of the maximum amount.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals”: 25.115 percent of the maximum amount.

(C) The amount of funds allocated pursuant to subparagraph (B) to each of the particular groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall then be distributed as special supplemental payment adjustments among the eligible hospitals within each particular group as follows:

(i) The department shall compute the projected total payment adjustment amounts for all eligible hospitals for the 1997–98 payment adjustment year, exclusive of any payments under this subdivision, subdivision (ad), or subdivision (af), by determining for each eligible hospital its total per diem composite amount and multiplying that figure by the maximum number of the hospital’s Medi-Cal inpatient paid days determined
 under paragraph (2) of subdivision (l). For purposes of this clause, the determinations shall be without regard to the OBRA 1993 payment limitations.

(ii) The amount computed under clause (i) for each hospital described in subparagraph (A) shall be compared to the amount that is the product of multiplying 0.95 times the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital for the 1997–98 payment adjustment year.

(iii) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital is equal to or exceeds the product computed for the hospital under clause (ii), the hospital shall not receive a special supplemental payment adjustment. Data regarding hospitals that have reached this limitation shall not be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii).

(iv) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital is less than the product computed for the hospital under clause (ii), the amount computed under clause (i) for the hospital shall be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii).

(v) The figures determined under clause (iv) for each hospital in the particular group shall be added together to determine an aggregate total for each group.

(vi) The figures determined for each hospital under clause (iv) shall be divided by the aggregate total determined under clause (v) for the particular group, yielding a percentage figure for each hospital.

(vii) The percentage figure determined for each hospital under clause (vi) shall be applied to the maximum portion of the funds allocated to
 the particular group under subparagraph (B), to determine the hospital’s pro rata share of the special supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments. Except, however, in the case of a nonpublic hospital that, as of July 1, 1997, meets the definition of a children’s hospital, such pro rata share otherwise determined shall be multiplied by a factor of 1.09, yielding a modified pro rata share. The pro rata share for the other nonpublic hospitals shall be reduced accordingly, yielding a modified pro rata share, so that the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the nonpublic hospitals group will not be exceeded. The pro rata share or modified pro rata share, as applicable, for each hospital, as computed under this clause, shall also be used for all purposes relating to descending pro rata distributions under clause (viii).

(viii) In no event shall a hospital receive special supplemental payment adjustment amounts in excess of the difference between
 the product computed for the hospital under clause (ii) and the amount computed for the hospital under clause (i). Any special supplemental payment adjustment amount, or portion thereof, that otherwise would have been payable under this paragraph to a hospital, but that is barred by this limitation, shall be distributed on a descending pro rata basis to those hospitals within the same group.

(D) The department shall make interim and final payments of the special supplemental payment adjustments to hospitals on or before February 28, 1998.

(4) The department shall implement this subdivision only if consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only if the department determines that federal financial participation is available.

(ac) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the payment
 adjustment program with respect to the period October 1, 1997 through June 30, 1998, shall be structured as set forth below and in subdivisions (ad) and (af). However, if the effective date of the Medi-Cal State Plan amendment relating to this subdivision is later than October 1, 1997, as approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration, all references in this subdivision to the period October 1, 1997, through June 30, 1998, shall be references to the period that commences on that effective date and continues through June 30, 1998.

(1) (A) The department shall utilize the computations made pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (ab) of the projected total payment adjustment amounts for all eligible hospitals for the entire 1997–98 payment adjustment year, exclusive of any supplemental payments under subdivision (ab), (ad), or (af).

(B) The computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for each hospital shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital.

(C) Where the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under subparagraph (A) shall be reduced to an amount equal to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the particular hospital. The amount so reduced shall be used for purposes of subparagraph (E).

(D) Where the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital is equal to or less than the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the computed amount referred to in
 subparagraph (A) shall be used for purposes of subparagraph (E).

(E) The amounts determined under subparagraphs (C) and (D) for all eligible hospitals shall be added together, yielding an aggregate sum. The aggregate sum shall be the unadjusted projected total payment adjustment program for the entire 1997–98 payment adjustment year, exclusive of any supplemental payments under subdivision (ab) or (ad).

(2) The initial maximum size of the payment adjustment program for the entire 1997–98 payment adjustment year shall be set at one billion seven hundred fifty million dollars ($1,750,000,000), exclusive of any supplemental payments under subdivision (ab) or (ad).

(3) The department shall increase or decrease the amount determined for each eligible hospital under subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (1), as applicable,
 by multiplying the amount by an identical percentage, yielding the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the 1997–98 payment adjustment year. The identical percentage figure to be used for this purpose shall be that percentage that is derived by dividing the amount set forth in paragraph (2) by the aggregate sum determined under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1). Except, however, the amount determined for a hospital under subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (1) shall not be increased if it would exceed the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital.

(4) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount computed for each eligible hospital under paragraph (3) shall be further adjusted as follows:

(A) (i) For each eligible hospital that met the definition of a nonpublic-converted hospital as of July 1,
 1997, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “nonpublic-converted hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be that which is necessary to result in an amount, for each hospital, equal to the amount used for the particular hospital under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1). The amount so adjusted shall be used for purposes of clause (iii).

(ii) The total amount of all per diem payment adjustment amounts under this section, whether paid or payable, applicable to the period July 1, 1997, through September 30, 1997, shall be determined for each hospital referred to in clause (i). The applicability of the per diem payment adjustment amounts to the period July 1, 1997, through September 30, 1997, shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. However, if the
 effective date of the Medi-Cal State Plan amendment relating to this subdivision is later than October 1, 1997, as approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration, all determinations under this clause shall include per diem payment adjustment amounts applicable to the period July 1, 1997, through the date that is one day prior to that effective date.

(iii) The amount determined for each hospital under clause (i) shall be reduced by the amount determined under clause (ii) for the hospital. The resulting figure shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1, 1997, through June 30, 1998, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5).

(B) (i) For each eligible hospital that met the definition of a nonpublic hospital as of July 1, 1997, the hospital’s tentative
 adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “nonpublic hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be derived as follows:

(I) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts determined under paragraph (3) for each nonpublic hospital described above shall be added together.

(II) The amount identified in paragraph (2) shall be divided by 2.38. The resulting figure shall then be reduced by the sum of the amounts determined for all nonpublic-converted hospitals under clauses (ii) and (iii) of subparagraph (A).

(III) The amount computed under subclause (II) shall be divided by 2, and the result thereof further reduced by the amount of thirty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($37,500,000).

(IV) The applicable adjustment factor shall be that ratio that results from dividing the amount derived in subclause (III) by the amount derived in subclause (I).

(ii) The total amount of all per diem payment adjustment amounts under this section, whether paid or payable, applicable to the period July 1, 1997, through September 30, 1997, shall be determined for each hospital referred to in clause (i). The applicability of the per diem payment adjustment amounts to the period July 1, 1997, through September 30, 1997, shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. However, if the effective date of the Medi-Cal State Plan amendment relating to this subdivision is later than October 1, 1997, as approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration, all determinations under this
 clause shall include per diem payment adjustment amounts applicable to the period July 1, 1997, through the date that is one day prior to that effective date.

(iii) The amount determined for each hospital under clause (i) shall be reduced by the amount determined under clause (ii) for the hospital. The resulting figure shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1, 1997, through June 30, 1998, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5).

(C) (i) For each eligible hospital that met the definition of a public hospital as of July 1, 1997, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “public hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be derived as follows:

(I) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts determined under paragraph (3) for each public hospital described above shall be added together.

(II) The amount identified in paragraph (2) shall be reduced by the sum of the amounts determined for all nonpublic-converted hospitals under clauses (ii) and (iii) of subparagraph (A) and the sum of the amounts determined for all nonpublic hospitals under clauses (ii) and (iii) of subparagraph (B).

(III) The applicable adjustment factor shall be that ratio that results from dividing the amount derived in subclause (II) by the amount derived in subclause (I).

(ii) The total amount of all per diem payment adjustment amounts under this section, whether paid or payable, applicable to the period
 July 1, 1997, through September 30, 1997, shall be determined for each hospital referred to in clause (i). The applicability of the per diem payment adjustment amounts to the period July 1, 1997, through September 30, 1997, shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. However, if the effective date of the Medi-Cal State Plan amendment relating to this subdivision is later than October 1, 1997, as approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration, all determinations under this clause shall include per diem payment adjustment amounts applicable to the period July 1, 1997, through the date that is one day prior to that effective date.

(iii) The amount determined for each hospital under clause (i) shall be reduced by the amount determined under clause (ii) for the hospital. The resulting figure shall be the final adjusted
 projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1, 1997, through June 30, 1998, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5).

(5) The final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount determined for each eligible hospital for the period October 1, 1997, through June 30, 1998, shall be distributed in 16 or fewer equal installments to be paid no later than the 10th and 25th day of each month during the period that commences on the effective date of the Medi-Cal State Plan amendment relating to this subdivision, as approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration, and continues through May 25, 1998.

(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the entire 1997–98 payment adjustment year, no eligible hospital shall receive total payment adjustments, including per diem payment adjustments, payments under
 this subdivision, and any supplemental payments under subdivision (ab) or (ad), in excess of the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation as computed by the department pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan. No hospital shall receive any special supplemental payment adjustments or supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments to the extent the payments would be inconsistent with subdivision (ab) or (ad), respectively.

(7) The aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts computed under paragraph (4) for each eligible hospital for the period October 1, 1997, through June 30, 1998, plus the aggregate sum of the amounts determined for each eligible hospital under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4), clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) and clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4), shall be the maximum size of the payment adjustment program for the entire 1997–98 payment adjustment year,
 exclusive of the special supplemental payment adjustments provided for under subdivision (ab) and the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments provided for under subdivision (ad).

(8) The department shall implement this subdivision only if consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only if the department determines that federal financial participation is available.

(ad) (1) For the 1997–98 payment adjustment year, eligible hospitals that meet the requirements of this subdivision and that remain in operation as of June 30, 1998, shall be eligible to receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the facility being a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date, but only if the hospital has remained in operation for the period October 1, 1997, to June 30, 1998, inclusive.

(2) The amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments available to hospitals under this subdivision shall be four hundred five million dollars ($405,000,000).

(3) (A) For purposes of these supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments, only hospitals that can be categorized into either of the two groups specified in clauses (i) and (ii) shall be eligible to receive the supplemental payment adjustments, and no hospital may qualify for more than one of the two groups. The following groups of hospitals shall be recognized:

(i) “Public hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1997, met the definition of a public hospital.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of
 July 1, 1997, met the definition of a nonpublic hospital.

(B) The amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments as referred to in paragraph (2) shall first be allocated between the two groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraph (A) as follows:

(i) “Public hospitals”: 72.17 percent of the amount.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals”: 27.83 percent of the amount.

(C) The amount of funds allocated pursuant to subparagraph (B) to each of the particular groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall then be distributed as supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments among the eligible hospitals within each particular group as follows:

(i) The department shall identify for each
 eligible hospital the total amount of payment adjustments under this section (exclusive of any payments under this subdivision and subdivision (af)) applicable to the 1997–98 payment adjustment year, whether paid or payable. The applicability of the payment adjustment amounts to this period of time shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ii) The amount identified for each hospital under clause (i) shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital for the 1997–98 payment adjustment year.

(iii) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital is equal to or exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the
 hospital, the hospital shall not receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment. Data regarding hospitals that have reached this limitation shall not be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii).

(iv) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital is less than the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under clause (i) minus that amount paid or payable to the hospital under subdivision (ab) shall be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii).

(v) The figures determined under clause (iv) for each hospital in the particular group shall be added together to determine an aggregate total for each group.

(vi) The figures determined for each hospital under clause (iv) shall be divided by the aggregate total determined under clause (v) for the particular
 group, yielding a percentage figure for each hospital.

(vii) The percentage figure determined for each hospital under clause (vi) shall be applied to the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the particular group under subparagraph (B), to determine the hospital’s pro rata share of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments. Except, however, in the case of a nonpublic hospital that, as of July 1, 1997, meets the definition of a children’s hospital, the pro rata share otherwise determined shall be multiplied by a factor of 1.09, yielding a modified pro rata share. The pro rata share for the other nonpublic hospitals shall be reduced accordingly, yielding a modified pro rata share, so that the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the nonpublic hospitals group will not be exceeded. The pro rata share or modified pro rata share, as applicable, for each hospital, as computed under this clause, shall also be used for all purposes relating
 to descending pro rata distributions under clause (viii).

(viii) In no event shall a hospital receive supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amounts in excess of the difference between the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital and the amount computed for the hospital under clause (i). Any supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount, or portion thereof, that otherwise would have been payable under this paragraph to a hospital, but that is barred by this limitation, shall be distributed on a descending pro rata basis to those hospitals within the same group.

(D) The department shall make interim and final payments of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments to hospitals on or before August 15, 1998.

(4) The department shall implement this subdivision only if consistent with federal medicaid law and
 the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only if the department determines that federal financial participation is available.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the payment adjustments, data, and related aspects of subdivision (af) shall not be taken into account for any purpose under this subdivision, subdivision (ab), or subdivision (ac).

(ae) (1) In the event that any provision of subdivision (ab), (ac), or (ad), as reflected in a proposed Medi-Cal State Plan amendment, is not approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration, the director shall modify the proposed Medi-Cal State Plan amendment in a manner intended to be consistent with all applicable federal requirements. Subject to the requirements of federal law, in developing the modified proposed Medi-Cal State Plan amendment, the director shall, to the extent practicable, incorporate,
 implement, and modify, as necessary, the payment methodologies applicable to the 1997–98 payment adjustment year in a manner that is as consistent as possible with the approach and intent of subdivisions (ab), (ac), and (ad), respectively.

(2) In the event that any provision of subdivision (af), (ag), (ah), (ai), or (aj), as reflected in a proposed Medi-Cal State Plan amendment, is not approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration, the director shall modify that proposed Medi-Cal State Plan amendment in a manner intended to be consistent with all applicable federal requirements. Subject to the requirements of federal law, in developing the modified proposed Medi-Cal State Plan amendment, the director shall, to the extent practicable, incorporate, implement, and modify, as necessary, the payment methodologies applicable to the 1997–98, 1998–99, and 1999–2000 payment adjustment years in a manner that is as consistent as possible
 with the approach and intent of subdivisions (af), (ag), (ah), (ai), and (aj), respectively.

(3) In the event that any provision of subdivision (ak), (al), (am), or (an), as reflected in a proposed Medi-Cal State Plan amendment, is not approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration, the director shall modify that proposed Medi-Cal State Plan amendment in a manner intended to be consistent with all applicable federal requirements. Subject to the requirements of federal law, in developing the modified proposed Medi-Cal State Plan amendment, the director shall, to the extent practicable, and after consulting with representatives of the hospital industry, including, but not limited to, the California Healthcare Association, incorporate, implement, and modify, as necessary, the payment methodologies applicable to the 2000–01 payment adjustment year and subsequent payment adjustment years in a manner that is as consistent as
 possible with the approach and intent of subdivisions (ak), (al), (am), and (an), respectively.

(af) (1) The provisions of this subdivision shall apply for the 1997–98 payment adjustment year, and, for all purposes under the program, shall be implemented subsequent to the provisions of subdivisions (ab), (ac), and (ad). Under this subdivision, eligible hospitals that, as of October 1, 1997, were part of a county-operated health system of three or more eligible hospitals licensed to the county, and that are in operation as of June 30, 1998, shall be eligible to receive an additional supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the facility being a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date, but only if the hospital has remained in operation for the period October 1, 1997, through June 30, 1998.

(2) The maximum amount of additional supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision shall be one hundred sixty-six million dollars ($166,000,000).

(3) The maximum amount of funds specified under paragraph (2) shall be distributed as additional supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments among the hospitals eligible under this subdivision as follows:

(A) The department shall identify for each eligible hospital the total amount of payment adjustments under this section (exclusive of any payments under this subdivision) applicable to the 1997–98 payment adjustment year, whether paid or payable. The applicability of the payment adjustment amounts to this period of time shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) The amount identified for each hospital under subparagraph (A) shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital for the 1997–98 payment adjustment year.

(C) Where the amount computed under subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital is equal to or exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the hospital shall not receive an additional supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment. Data regarding hospitals that have reached this limitation shall not be used for purposes of subparagraphs (E) through (H).

(D) Where the amount computed under subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital is less than the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under
 subparagraph (A) shall be used for purposes of subparagraphs (E) through (H).

(E) The figures determined under subparagraph (D) for each hospital eligible to receive additional supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision shall be added together to determine an aggregate total.

(F) The figures determined for each hospital under subparagraph (D) shall be divided by the aggregate total determined under subparagraph (E), yielding a percentage figure for each hospital.

(G) The percentage figure determined for each hospital under subparagraph (F) shall be applied to the maximum amount specified in paragraph (2), to determine the hospital’s pro rata share of the additional supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments.

(H) In no event shall a